Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 1. Board of Psychologist and Psychological Associate Examiners.

Sec. 08.86.010.
Creation and membership of board.

There is created a Board of Psychologist and Psychological Associate Examiners.
It consists of three licensed psychologists, a licensed psychological associate, and one person who has no direct financial interest in the health care industry.

History.

(§ 1 ch 136 SLA 1967; am § 1 ch 65 SLA 1973; am § 30 ch 102 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 58 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 79 SLA 1987)

Sec. 08.86.020.
Appointment and term of office. [Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987. For current law, see AS 08.01.035.]

Sec. 08.86.025.
Removal of board members. [Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987. For current law, see AS 08.01.020.]

Sec. 08.86.030.
Board meetings.

The board shall hold at least three meetings annually.
The board may hold special meetings at the call of the chairman or of a majority of the board members.

History.

(§ 1 ch 136 SLA 1967; am § 5 ch 58 SLA 1980)

Sec. 08.86.040.
Assistants.

The board may employ assistants to prepare and grade examinations and to investigate alleged violations of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 136 SLA 1967)

Sec. 08.86.050.
Transportation and per diem. [Repealed, § 1 ch 42 SLA 1977.]